Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-20,197
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Effect of conversion.

(1) A domestic
corporation that has been converted pursuant to the Business Corporation Act
is for all purposes the same domestic corporation that existed before the
conversion.

(2) When a
conversion takes effect, all of the following apply:

(a) All property owned
by the converting entity remains vested in the converted entity. The converting
entity shall file a certificate of conversion in the office of the register
of deeds for each county in which the converting entity owns real property.
Such certificate of conversion shall be indexed against the real property
owned;

(b) All debts, liabilities, and other obligations of the converting
entity continue as obligations of the converted entity;

(c) An action
or proceeding pending by or against the converting entity may be continued
as if the conversion had not occurred;

(d) The shares or interests of the converting
entity are reclassified into shares, interests, or other securities, obligations,
rights to acquire shares, interests, or other securities, or into cash or
other property in accordance with the plan of conversion; and the shareholders
or interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights
provided to them under the terms of the conversion and to any appraisal rights
they may have under the organic law of the converting entity;

(e) Except
as prohibited by other law, all of the rights, privileges, immunities, powers,
and purposes of the converting entity remain vested in the converted entity;
and

(f) Except as otherwise provided in the plan of conversion, the
terms and conditions of the plan of conversion take effect.

(3) A converted
entity that is a foreign limited liability company consents to the jurisdiction
of the courts of this state to enforce any obligation owed by the converting
corporation if, before the conversion, the converting corporation was subject
to suit in this state on the obligation.

Laws 2012, LB1018, § 8.